nb: Forretninger og industri > Gruvedrift og steinbrudd: Gruve- og steinbruddsmaskineri; Gruve- og steinbruddstilbehør
el: Επιχειρηματικός & βιομηχανικός εξοπλισμός > Εξόρυξη & λατομεία: Μηχανήματα εξόρυξης & λατομείων; Εξοπλισμός/προμήθειες εξόρυξης & λατομείων
it: Commercio e industria > Estrazione e cave: Macchinario per estrazione e cave; Forniture per estrazione e cave
fr: Entreprise et industrie > Exploitation des carrières et extraction: Machines pour l’exploitation des mines et des carrières; Équipements pour carrières et extraction
ru: Бизнес и промышленность > Горное дело: Оборудование для горных разработок; Материалы для горных разработок
da: Erhverv og industri > Minedrift og stenbrud: Maskiner til minedrift og stenbrud; Forsyninger til minedrift og stenbrud
sk-SK: Obchod a priemysel > Hlbinná a povrchová ťažba: Hlbinné a povrchové ťažobné stroje; Potreby pre hlbinnú a povrchovú ťažbu
pt-PT: Business e industrial > Exploração mineira e de pedras: Maquinaria de exploração mineira e de pedreira; Artigos mineiros e de pedras
lt-LT: Verslas ir pramonė > Kasyba ir akmenskaldyba: Kasybos ir akmenskaldybos mašinos; Kasybos ir akmenskaldybos reikmenys
zh-CN: 商业/工业 > 采矿与采石: 采矿和采石机; 采矿和采石用品
ja: ビジネス・産業 > 鉱業・採石: 採鉱&採石機械; 鉱業・採石用品
nl: Zakelijk en industrieel > Mijnbouw en steengroeven: Mijnbouw- en steengroevebenodigdheden; Mijnbouw- en steengroevenbenodigdheden
zh-TW: 商業與各產業 > 採礦和採石業: 採礦/採石機械; 採礦和採石用品
sl-SI: Posel in industrija > Rudarstvo in kamnoseštvo: Stroji za rudarstvo in kamnoseštvo; Pripomočki za rudarstvo in kamnolome
bg-BG: Бизнес и промишленост > Миньорство и кариери: Минни и кариерни машини; Консумативи за миньорство и кариери
hu: Üzlet és ipar > Bányászat és kőfejtés: Bányász- és kőfejtőgépek; Bányászati és kőfejtési kellékek
th: ธุรกิจและอุตสาหกรรม > การทำเหมืองและเหมืองแร่: เครื่องจักรสำหรับการทำเหมืองแร่และเหมืองหิน; อุปกรณ์สำหรับการทำเหมืองแร่และเหมืองหิน
sv: Företag och industri > Gruvdrift och stenbrott: Gruv- och stenbrytningsmaskiner; Gruv- och stenbrytningsmaterial
es: Economía e industria > Minería y explotación de canteras: Maquinaría para minería y canteras; Suministros para minería y canteras
hr-HR: Posao i industrija > Rudarstvo i vađenje kamena: Strojevi za rudarstvo i vađenje kamena; Potrepštine za rudarstvo i vađenje kamena
vi: Kinh doanh & Công nghiệp > Khai mỏ và khai thác đá: Phụ tùng khai thác mỏ và khai thác đá; Phụ tùng khai thác mỏ và khai thác đá
de: Wirtschaft & Industrie > Bergbau & Steinbruch: Bergbau- und Steinbruchmaschinen; Bergbau- und Steinbruchbedarf
fi: Yritys ja teollisuus > Kaivos ja louhinta: Kaivos- ja louhintakoneet; Kaivos- ja louhintatarvikkeet
tr: İş ve Endüstri > Madencilik ve Taş Ocakçılığı: Madencilik ve Taşocakçılığı Makineleri; Madencilik ve Taş Ocakçılığı Malzemeleri
ko: 비즈니스/산업 > 채굴/채석: 채굴/채석 기계; 채굴/채석 용품
pl: Biznes i przemysł > Górnictwo głębinowe i odkrywkowe: Maszyny dla górnictwa głębinowego i odkrywkowego; Materiały dla górnictwa głębinowego i odkrywkowego
cs: Obchod a průmysl > Těžba: Těžební a dobývací stroje; Potřeby pro těžbu
ro-RO: Afaceri și sectorul industrial > Exploatare mine și cariere: Echipamente pentru exploatare mine și cariere; Articole exploatare mine și cariere
pt-BR: Comercial e industrial > Mineração: Máquinas para mineração e pedreiras; Suprimentos para mineração e pedreiras
en: Business & Industrial > Mining & Quarrying: Mining & Quarrying Machinery; Mining & Quarrying Supplies